Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 1. Utilities in Highways.

Sec. 19.25.010.
Use of rights-of-way for utilities.

A utility facility may be constructed, placed, or maintained across, along, over, under, or within a state right-of-way only in accordance with regulations adopted by the department and if authorized by a written permit issued by the department.
The department may charge a fee for a permit issued under this section.

History.

(§ 8 art VII title II ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 3 ch 106 SLA 1977; am § 36 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

Sec. 19.25.020.
Relocation of utilities incident to highway projects.

If, incident to the construction of a highway project, the department determines and orders that a utility facility located across, along, over, under, or within a state right-of-way must be changed, relocated, or removed, the utility owning or maintaining the facility shall change, relocate, or remove it in accordance with the order. The order must provide a reasonable time period for compliance.

If the utility facility is not changed, relocated, or removed in accordance with the order, the facility becomes an unauthorized encroachment and may be disposed of in accordance with AS

19.25.240

—

19.25.250

. In addition, the owner of the facility shall indemnify the state for any amount for which the state may be liable to a contractor by reason of the encroachment.

The cost of change, relocation, or removal necessitated by highway construction is a cost of highway construction to be paid in accordance with AS

19.59.001

(4) as follows:

by the department as a cost of highway construction, if the utility facility is installed or authorized under a utility permit or a regulation after June 11, 1986, and is installed in the location specified in the permit;

by the department as a cost of highway construction, if the facility was installed before June 11, 1986, under a utility permit issued on or after July 1, 1960, and is in the location specified in the permit;

by the department as a cost of highway construction, if the utility facility was installed before July 1, 1960, or before the road became part of the state highway system;

by the department as a cost of highway construction, if the utility permit that requires the utility to pay the relocation cost was issued more than five years before the contract for the highway construction project was first advertised;

by the utility in all other cases, unless the commissioner finds it is in the public interest for the cost to be paid by the department.

If requested by a municipality, the department shall implement this chapter by requiring to the maximum extent possible location underground of electric power transmission lines within the municipality.

History.

(§§ 2, 3 ch 57 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 106 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 142 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, in subsection (c), “AS

19.59.001

(4)” was substituted for “AS

19.45.001

(4)” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of AS

19.45.001

.

Administrative Code. —

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section is constitutional. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 12.

Secs. 19.25.030 — 19.25.040.
Damages and obstructions. [Repealed, § 5 ch 52 SLA 1988.]